test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex-der-lekkasid_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
    
  Verb - teddiliđ: # copied from Clex_meridud
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Inf: teddiluđ
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: teddiluum
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: teddiluuh
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: teddiluvvoo
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: teddiluvvoon
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: teddiluuvettee
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: teddiluvvov
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: teddilup
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: teddiluuvetteđ
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: teddiluvvojeh
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: teddiluvvim
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: teddiluvvih
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: teddilui
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: teddiluim
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: teddiluid
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: teddiluin
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: teddiluim
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: teddiluid
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: teddiluvvojii
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: teddiluuččim
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: teddiluuččih
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: teddiluuččij
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: teddiluuččáim
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: teddiluuččáid
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: teddiluuččáin
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: teddiluuččijm
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: teddiluuččijd
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: teddiluuččii
#    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: teddilužžeem
#    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: teddilužžeeh
#    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: teddiluš            # teddiluž
#    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: teddilužžeen
#    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: teddilušvettee      # teddilužvettee
#    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: teddilužžuv
#    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: teddilužžep
#    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: teddilušvetteđ      # teddilužvetteđ
#    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: teddilužeh

    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Imprt+Sg2: teddiluu
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Imprt+Sg3: teddiluvvus
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Imprt+Du1: teddiluvvoon      
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Imprt+Du2: teddiluvvee          
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Imprt+Du3: teddiluvvus
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Imprt+Pl1: teddiluvvop 
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Imprt+Pl2: teddiluđ              
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Imprt+Pl3: teddiluvvus   
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: teddiluu
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: teddilum
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: teddiluččii
#    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: teddilužžii
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrsPrc: teddiluvvee
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: teddilum
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Nom: teddilum
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ess: teddiluumin
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Loc: teddiluumist
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ill: teddiluumân
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Com: teddiluudijn
    teddiliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+VAbess: teddiluuhánnáá
    
    
